Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB323.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 422.305 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) When a subpoena duces tecum is served upon any employee of any medical
provider[hospital], requiring the production of any[ such] medical charts or
records at any action or proceeding, it is sufficient if the employee of the
medical provider[hospital] charged with the responsibility of being custodian
of the original charts or records[thereof] promptly notifies, in writing, the
attorney for the party causing service of the subpoena, of the medical
provider's[hospital's] election to proceed under the provisions of KRS
422.300 to 422.330 and of the estimated actual and reasonable expenses of
reproducing the requested[such] charts or records.
(b) Upon receipt of the[such] notification, the attorney causing the service of the
subpoena shall notify all other attorneys of record, or other parties if they are
not represented by attorneys, of the medical provider's[hospital's] election.
(c) Following the medical provider's[such] election, the employee of the medical
provider[hospital] charged with the responsibility of being custodian of the
original charts or records specified in the subpoena shall hold the originals
available at the medical provider's facility[hospital], and upon payment to the
medical provider[hospital] of the estimated reproduction expenses by the
party causing service of the subpoena, or by any other party, shall promptly
deliver, by certified mail or by personal delivery, legible and durable copies,
certified by the medical provider's[said hospital] employee, of all medical
charts or records specified in the[such] subpoena to the person specified in the
subpoena.
(2) (a) The certification shall be signed before a notary public by the employee of the
medical facility[hospital] charged with[ the responsibility of] being the
Page 1 of 3
BR218100.100 - 2181 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2181
custodian of the records and shall include the full name of the patient, the
patient's medical record number, the number of pages in the medical record,
and a legend substantially to the following effect: "The copies of records for
which this certification is made are true and complete reproductions of the
original or microfilmed medical records which are housed in (name of
medical provider[hospital]). The original records were made in the regular
course of business, and it was the regular course of (name of medical
provider[hospital]) to make the[such] records at or near the time of the matter
recorded. This certification is given pursuant to KRS .... by the custodian of
the records in lieu of his or her personal appearance."
(b) 1. The[Such] copies shall be separately enclosed and sealed in an inner
envelope or wrapper bearing the legend "Copies of Medical Records.[,]"
2. [and ]The title and number of the action or proceeding, the date of the
subpoena, the name of the medical provider[hospital], the full name of
the patient, the patient's medical record number, and the name and
business telephone number of the employee making the certification,
together with[and] the sealed envelope or wrapper and[, together with]
the certification, shall then be enclosed and sealed in an outer envelope
or wrapper, and delivered to the requesting party.
(3) (a) When the copies of records are personally delivered, a receipt shall be
presented to the person receiving the records for his or her signature and shall
be immediately signed and returned to the person delivering the records. The
receipt shall contain the name of the medical provider[hospital], the full name
of the patient, the medical record number of the patient, the date the copies of
records were received, and the signature of the person receiving the records.
(b) When the copies of records are sent via certified mail, the receipt used by the
postal authorities shall be sufficient to prove delivery and receipt of the copies
Page 2 of 3
BR218100.100 - 2181 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2181
of records.
(4) If the medical provider[hospital] has none of the charts or records specified in the
subpoena, or only part of the charts or records[thereof], the employee of the
medical provider[hospital] charged with[ the responsibility of] being the custodian
of the original medical provider's[hospital] charts or records shall[ so] state that
fact in a notarized affidavit and, following notice and payment of expenses shall
hold available the original charts or records which are in the medical
provider's[hospital's] custody and specified in the subpoena, and shall deliver the
certified[ the] copies together with the affidavit.
(5) A subpoena duces tecum under subsection (1) of this section shall be served no
later than fourteen (14) days prior to the date and time set in the subpoena
commanding the appearance and production of the requested charts or records
for inspection and copying.
Page 3 of 3
BR218100.100 - 2181 - XXXX 3/11/2026 3:17 PM Jacketed